Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-897
Interstate bridges; interstate agreements; division of costs.

Except as otherwise provided by sections 39-898 and 39-8,110, any agreement made between the department and an adjoining state pursuant to the provisions of sections 39-891 to 39-8,122 shall provide that all costs incurred under such agreement shall be shared by the department and the adjoining state in proportion to the percentage of the bridge structure which is located, or which will be located, within each state.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 7, p. 636.